Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2009
Garbage bags; requirements.

On and after January 1, 1992, a person shall not sell or offer for sale at retail any bag used for or intended to be used for grass clippings, garbage, yard waste, or leaves which is constructed of a material which is not biodegradable, photodegradable, or recyclable.

Laws 1989, LB 325, § 9;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 73.